Vermont, session 2025-2026, H369.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 15 V.S.A. § 650 is amended to read:
§ 650. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND PURPOSE
The legislature General Assembly finds and declares as public policy that
after parents have separated or dissolved their civil marriage, it is in the best
interests of their minor child children to have the opportunity for maximum
continuing physical and emotional contact with both parents and encourages
parents to share in the rights and responsibilities of raising their children after
VT LEG #379579 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.369
2025 Page 2 of 5
the parents have separated or divorced, unless direct physical harm or
significant emotional harm to the child or a parent is likely to result from such
contact. The legislature General Assembly further finds and declares as public
policy that parents have the responsibility to provide child support, and that
child support orders should reflect the true costs of raising children and
approximate insofar as possible the standard of living the child would have
enjoyed had the family remained intact.
Sec. 2. 15 V.S.A. § 664 is amended to read:
§ 664. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Parental rights and responsibilities” means the rights and
responsibilities related to a child’s physical living arrangements, education,
medical and dental care, religion, travel, and any other matter involving a
child’s welfare and upbringing.
(A)(2) “Legal responsibility” means the rights and responsibilities to
determine and control various matters affecting a child’s welfare and
upbringing, other than routine daily care and control of the child. These
matters include but are not limited to education, medical and dental care,
religion, and travel arrangements. Legal responsibility may be held solely or
may be divided or shared.
VT LEG #379579 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.369
2025 Page 3 of 5
(B)(3) “Physical responsibility” means the rights and responsibilities
to provide routine daily care and control of the child subject to the right of the
other parent to have contact with the child. Physical responsibility may be
held solely or may be divided or shared pursuant to the parenting plan.
(2) “Parent child contact” means the right of a parent who does not have
physical responsibility to have visitation with the child.
Sec. 3. 15 V.S.A. § 665 is amended to read:
§ 665. RIGHTS AND RESPONSIBILITIES ORDER; PARENTING PLAN;
BEST INTERESTS OF THE CHILD
(a) In an action under this chapter, the court shall make issue an order
concerning parental rights and responsibilities of and a parenting plan for any
minor child of the parties. The court may order parental rights and
responsibilities to be divided or shared between the parents on such terms and
conditions as serve the best interests of the child. When the parents cannot
agree to divide or share parental rights and responsibilities, the court shall
award parental rights and responsibilities primarily or solely to one parent
There shall be a rebuttable presumption that shared parental rights and
responsibilities are in the best interests of the child.
(b) In making an order under this section, the court shall be guided by the
best interests of the child and shall consider at least the following factors:
VT LEG #379579 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.369
2025 Page 4 of 5
(1) the relationship of the child with each parent and the ability and
disposition of each parent to provide the child with love, affection, and
guidance;
(2) the ability and disposition of each parent to assure ensure that the
child receives adequate food, clothing, medical care, other material needs, and
a safe environment;
(3) the ability and disposition of each parent to meet the child’s present
and future developmental needs;
(4) the quality of the child’s adjustment to the child’s present housing,
school, and community and the potential effect of any change;
(5) the ability and disposition of each parent to support and foster a
positive relationship and frequent and continuing contact with the other parent,
including physical, written, telephonic, and electronic contact, except where
contact will result in harm to the child or to a parent;
(6) the quality of the child’s relationship with the primary care provider,
if appropriate given the child’s age and development; [Repealed.]
(7) the relationship of the child with any other person who may
significantly affect the child;
(8) the ability and disposition of the parents to communicate, cooperate
with each other, and make joint decisions concerning the children where
parental rights and responsibilities are to be shared or divided child; and
VT LEG #379579 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.369
2025 Page 5 of 5
(9) evidence of abuse, as defined in section 1101 of this title, and the
impact of the abuse on the child and on the relationship between the child and
the abusing parent.
(c) The court shall not apply a preference for one parent over the other
because of the sex of the child, the sex of a parent, or the financial resources of
a parent.
(d) The court may order a parent who is awarded responsibility for a certain
matter involving a child’s welfare to inform the other parent when a major
change in that matter occurs. [Repealed.]
(e) The jurisdiction granted by this section shall be limited by the Uniform
Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, if another state has
jurisdiction as provided in that act. For the purposes of interpreting that act
and any other provision of law which that refers to a custodial parent,
including 13 V.S.A. § 2451, the parent with physical responsibility shall be
considered the custodial parent.
* * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379579 v.1